West Virginia, session 2025, SB942.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:ARTICLE 2A. USE OF DIESEL-POWERED EQUIPMENT IN UNDERGROUND COAL MINES.§22A-2A-101. Use of diesel-powered equipment authorized.Diesel-powered equipment for use in underground coal mines may only be approved, operated, and maintained in accordance with rules, requirements, and standards established pursuant to this article: Provided, That diesel-powered equipment may be moved from one mine, either in or out of the state, to another mine in the state, and operated immediately, so long as the equipment is in compliance with the provisions of this article and the director is notified before the equipment is put in service. AdoptedRejected